Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. Permissible Investments.

Sec. 06.55.501.
Maintenance of permissible investments.

A money services licensee shall maintain at all times permissible investments that have a market value computed under generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate amount of all of its outstanding payment instruments and stored value obligations issued or sold in all states and money transmitted from all states by the money services licensee.

The department, with respect to any money services licensees, may limit the extent to which a type of investment within a class of permissible investments may be considered a permissible investment, except for money and certificates of deposit issued by a bank. The department by regulation may prescribe or by order allow other types of investments that the department determines to have a safety substantially equivalent to other permissible investments.

Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of the money services licensee, are held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the money services licensee’s outstanding payment instruments and stored value obligations in the event of bankruptcy or receivership of the money services licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.55.502.
Types of permissible investments.

Except to the extent otherwise limited by the department under AS

06.55.501

, the following investments are permissible under AS

06.55.501

:

cash, a certificate of deposit, or a senior debt obligation of an insured depository institution; in this paragraph, “insured depository institution” has the meaning given in 12 U.S.C. 1813 (Federal Deposit Insurance Act);

banker’s acceptance or bill of exchange that is eligible for purchase on endorsement by a member bank of the Federal Reserve System and is eligible for purchase by a Federal Reserve Bank;

an investment bearing a rating of one of the three highest grades as defined by a nationally recognized organization that rates securities;

an investment security that is an obligation of the United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States, an investment in an obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and interest by the United States, or an investment in an obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of a state;

receivables that are payable to a money services licensee from its authorized delegates, in the ordinary course of business, under contracts that are not past due or doubtful of collection if the aggregate amount of receivables under this paragraph does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a money services licensee and the money services licensee does not hold at one time receivables under this paragraph in any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the money services licensee’s total permissible investments; and

a share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company’s investment policy to investments specified in (1) — (4) of this subsection.

The following investments are permissible under AS

06.55.501

, but only to the extent specified:

an interest-bearing bill, note, bond, or debenture of a person whose equity shares are traded on a national securities exchange or on a national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this paragraph does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a money services licensee and the money services licensee does not at one time hold investments under this paragraph in any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the money services licensee’s total permissible investments;

a share of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market or a share or a certificate issued by an open-end management investment company that is registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940), and whose portfolio is restricted by the management company’s investment policy to shares of a person traded on a national securities exchange or a national over-the-counter market, if the aggregate of investments under this paragraph does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a money services licensee and the money services licensee does not at one time hold investments in any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the money services licensee’s total permissible investments;

a demand-borrowing agreement made to a corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation whose securities are traded on a national securities exchange, if the aggregate of the amount of principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements under this paragraph does not exceed 20 percent of the total permissible investments of a money services licensee and the money services licensee does not at one time hold principal and interest outstanding under demand-borrowing agreements under this paragraph with any one person aggregating more than 10 percent of the money services licensee’s total permissible investments; and

any other investment the department designates, to the extent specified by the department.

The aggregate of investments under (b) of this section may not exceed 50 percent of the total permissible investments of a money services licensee calculated under AS

06.55.501

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2007)